Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 8
MOFFAT TUNNEL IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT

Section

32-8-101. Purpose of tunnel.

The purpose of this article is to facilitate transportation and communication between the eastern and western portions of the state through the efficient operation and maintenance of the existing Moffat tunnel under the continental divide and to promote the health, comfort, safety, convenience, and welfare of the people of the state, with special benefit to the property within the boundaries of the improvement district created in this article.

Source:

L. 22:

p. 88, § 1.

C.L.

§ 9590.

CSA:

C. 138, § 200.

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 729, § 2, effective April 19.

L. 96:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1048, § 2, effective May 23.

32-8-101.5. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means the Moffat tunnel commission created pursuant to section 32-8-103 (1).

"Contract" or "contractual" means any contract, lease, license, permit, or other written authority for the use of the Moffat tunnel, its approaches, and equipment according to the terms of the underlying agreement.

"Department" means the department of local affairs created in section 24-1-125, C.R.S.

"District" means the Moffat tunnel improvement district created pursuant to this article.

"Moffat tunnel" or "tunnel" shall include any and all portions of the Moffat railroad tunnel, its approaches, or equipment.

"User" means any lessee, licensee, permittee, or other holder of any interest in, or any contractual right to use, any portion of the Moffat tunnel, but not any person claiming by, through, or under such user. "User" also includes the owner of any permanent improvements lawfully located on any portion of the Moffat tunnel or its approaches.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added with relocated provisions, p. 1071, § 5, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 24-32-2902.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 274, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

32-8-102. Territory comprising district.

There is hereby created an improvement district known and designated as the Moffat tunnel improvement district. Said district is declared to be a body corporate under the laws of Colorado, and by said name may sue and defend in all actions, suits, and proceedings.

Said district shall be comprised of the following territory: City and county of Denver, county of Grand, county of Moffat, county of Routt, and those portions of Eagle, Gilpin, Boulder, Adams, and Jefferson counties described as follows:

Eagle County: All of township two south, ranges eighty-two and eighty-three west of the sixth principal meridian;

Gilpin County: Commencing at the northwest corner of Gilpin county, thence east on the north boundary line of said county to the easterly boundary line of Gilpin county; thence southerly along said easterly boundary line to the point of intersection with the east and west center line of township two south in range seventy-two west of the sixth principal meridian; thence west along said east and west center line of township two south, to the point where the said east and west center line of township two south, intersects the westerly boundary line of Gilpin county, in range seventy-four west of the sixth principal meridian; thence northerly along said westerly boundary line to the place of beginning;

Jefferson County: Commencing at the northwest corner of Jefferson county, thence east along the north boundary line of said county to the northeast corner of section four, township two south, range sixty-nine west of the sixth principal meridian; thence south along the east lines of sections four, nine, and sixteen, township two south, range sixty-nine west of the sixth principal meridian to the southeast corner of said section sixteen; thence east along the north lines of sections twenty-two, twenty-three, and twenty-four of said township two south, range sixty-nine west, to the east line of Jefferson county; thence south along the east line of Jefferson county to the southeast corner of section thirteen, township three south, range sixty-nine west of the sixth principal meridian; thence west along the south lines of sections thirteen, fourteen, fifteen, sixteen, seventeen, and eighteen of said township three south, range sixty-nine west, to the southwest corner of said section eighteen; thence north along the west line of range sixty-nine west of the sixth principal meridian to the southeast corner of section twenty-five, township two south, range seventy west of the sixth principal meridian; thence west along the south lines of sections twenty-five, twenty-six, twenty-seven, twenty-eight, twenty-nine, and thirty of said township two south, range seventy west, and the south lines of sections twenty-five, twenty-six, and twenty-seven, township two south, range seventy-one west of the sixth principal meridian, to the southwest corner of section twenty-seven, township two south, range seventy-one west of the sixth principal meridian; thence north along the west lines of sections twenty-seven and twenty-two of said township two south, range seventy-one west, to the northwest corner of said section twenty-two; thence west along the south lines of sections sixteen, seventeen, and eighteen, township two south, range seventy-one west, and the east and west center line of township two south, range seventy-two west, to the west boundary line of Jefferson county; thence north along said west boundary line to the place of beginning;

Adams County: All of Adams county in township three south, range sixty-eight west of the sixth principal meridian;

Boulder County: Commencing at the southwest corner of Boulder county, thence easterly along the southerly boundary line of said county to the southeast corner of section thirty-one, township one south, range seventy west of the sixth principal meridian; thence north along the east lines of sections thirty-one and thirty, township one south, range seventy west of the sixth principal meridian, to the northeast corner of said section thirty; thence west along the north line of section thirty of said township one south, range seventy west, to the northwest corner of said section thirty; thence north along the east line of section twenty-four, township one south, range seventy-one west, to the northeast corner of said section twenty-four; thence west along the north lines of sections twenty-four, twenty-three, twenty-two, twenty-one, twenty, and nineteen, township one south, and ranges seventy-one, seventy-two, seventy-three, and seventy-four west, of the sixth principal meridian, to the westerly boundary line of Boulder county; thence south along said westerly boundary line to the place of beginning.

Source:

L. 22:

p. 89, § 2.

C.L.

§ 9591.

CSA:

C. 138, § 201.

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-2.

32-8-103. Commission - election - appointment - transfer of powers to the department of local affairs.

The district was, until February 1, 1998, managed and controlled by a board of five members known as the "Moffat tunnel commission". At that time, acting pursuant to Senate Bill 96-233, the department assumed the powers of the board.

to (3.5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 1069, § 2, effective August 7, 2002.)

(4) (Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 906, § 156, effective January 1, 1993.)

(5)(Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 1069, § 2, effective August 7, 2002.)

(6)(Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 1069, § 2, effective August 7, 2002.)

(7) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 1069, § 2, effective August 7, 2002.)

(8) The district shall be managed and controlled by the department. The department shall have the powers and duties set forth in sections

32-8-107

and

32-8-124

with respect to the district and the properties of the district.

Source:

L. 22:

p. 92, § 4.

C.L.

§ 9593.

L. 27:

p. 491, § 1.

L. 31:

p. 454, § 1.

CSA:

C. 138, § 203.

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-4.

L. 63:

p. 726, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-4.

L. 72:

p. 563, § 32.

L. 76:

(3) amended, p. 310, § 56, effective May 20.

L. 81:

(3) amended, p. 296, § 19, effective June 19.

L. 82:

(3) amended, p. 545, § 3, effective April 15.

L. 89:

(4) amended, p. 847, § 121, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(3) amended, p. 643, § 94, effective May 1.

L. 92:

(2) to (5) amended, p. 906, § 156, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(3) amended, p. 1441, § 140, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(3) amended, p. 1643, § 68, effective May 31.

L. 95:

(3) amended, p. 1107, § 48, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(3.5), (7), and (8) added, p. 1049, § 3, effective May 23.

L. 2001:

(7)(e) repealed, p. 1180, § 19, effective August 8.

L. 2002:

(1), (2), (3), (3.5), (5), (6), (7), and (8) amended, p. 1069, § 2, effective August 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsections (1), (2), (3), (3.5), (5), (6), (7), and (8), see section 1 of chapter 274, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

32-8-104. Officers - bonds - meetings - seal and records - reports - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 22:

p. 95, § 5.

C.L.

§ 9594.

CSA:

C. 138, § 204.

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-5.

L. 90:

(2) amended, p. 1499, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(5) added, p. 1050, § 4, effective May 23; (6) added by revision, p. 1053, § 7(2).

Editor's note:

Subsection (6) provided for the repeal of this section effective February 1, 1998, when the department of local affairs assumed the powers of the Moffat tunnel commission pursuant to § 32-8-103 (7). (See L. 96, p. 1053.) Said § 32-8-103 (7) was repealed in 2002.

32-8-105. Tunnel - location - construction. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 22:

p. 97, § 6.

C.L.

§ 9595.

CSA:

C. 138, § 205.

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-6.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1053, § 7(1), effective May 23.

32-8-106. Board to adopt plans - bids. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 22:

p. 97, § 7.

C.L.

§ 9596.

CSA:

C. 138, § 206.

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-7.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1053, § 7(1), effective May 23.

32-8-107. Powers of department.

The department has power on behalf of said district:

To employ a chief engineer, and such other engineers, assistants, and employees as may be necessary, and to provide for their compensation;

To secure the services of attorneys and provide for their compensation;

To preserve, operate, and maintain, or contract for the preservation, operation, and maintenance of the Moffat tunnel and its approaches and all necessary works incidental thereto; to equip and electrify the tunnel, its approaches and connections, and to construct and maintain power plants for the lighting, equipment, and electrifying of the tunnel, its approaches and connections;

To enter into and execute all contracts, leases, and other instruments in writing necessary or proper to the accomplishment of the purposes of this article;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 96, p. 1050, § 5, effective May 23, 1996.)

To adopt bylaws not in conflict with the constitution and laws of the state, in carrying out the purposes of this article;

To exercise all powers necessary and requisite for the accomplishment of the purposes for which this district is organized and capable of being delegated by the general assembly of the state of Colorado; and no enumeration of particular powers granted shall be construed to impair any general grant of power contained in this article, nor to limit any such grant to powers of the same class as those so enumerated;

To receive on behalf of the district aid or donations from any person or corporation or from the United States government for the purpose of preserving, operating, or maintaining the tunnel and its approaches and equipment;

To deposit moneys of the district that are not required to be transferred to each of the counties of the district or to the city and county of Denver pursuant to section

32-8-124

and that are not needed in the conduct of district affairs in any depository authorized in section

24-75-603

, C.R.S. For the purpose of making such deposits, the board may appoint, by written resolution, one or more persons to act as custodians of the moneys of the district. Such persons shall give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the board requires.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 1071, § 3, effective August 7, 2002.)

Source:

L. 22:

p. 98, § 8.

C.L.

§ 9597.

CSA:

C. 138, § 207.

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-8.

L. 79:

(1)(j) added, p. 1625, § 40, effective June 8.

L. 94:

(1)(k) added, p. 730, § 3, effective April 19.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 1050, § 5, effective May 23.

L. 98:

(1)(j) amended, p. 827, § 46, effective August 5.

L. 2002:

IP(1) and (1)(k) amended, p. 1071, § 3, effective August 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending the introductory portion to subsection (1) and subsection (1)(k), see section 1 of chapter 274, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

32-8-108. Contract for use of tunnel - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 22:

p. 99, § 9.

C.L.

§ 9598.

CSA:

C. 138, § 208.

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-9.

L. 96:

(3) added by revision, p. 1053, § 7(2).

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section effective February 1, 1998, when the department of local affairs assumed the powers of the Moffat tunnel commission pursuant to § 32-8-103 (7). (See L. 96, p. 1053.) Said § 32-8-103 (7) was repealed in 2002.

32-8-108.5. Disposition of district property - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1051, § 6, effective May 23; (4) added by revision, p. 1053, § 7(2).

Editor's note:

Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section effective February 1, 1998, when the department of local affairs assumed the powers of the Moffat tunnel commission pursuant to § 32-8-103 (7). (See L. 96, p. 1053.) Said § 32-8-103 (7) was repealed in 2002.

32-8-109. Bonds. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 22:

p. 101, § 10.

C.L.

§ 9599.

CSA:

C. 138, § 209.

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-10.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1053, § 7(1), effective May 23.

32-8-110. Special benefits - assessments. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 22:

p. 102, § 11.

C.L.

§ 9600.

CSA:

C. 138, § 210.

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-11.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1053, § 7(1), effective May 23.

32-8-111. Exemptions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 22:

p. 103, § 12.

C.L.

§ 9601.

CSA:

C. 138, § 211.

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-12.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1053, § 7(1), effective May 23.

32-8-112. Special assessments for deficits. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 22:

p. 103, § 13.

C.L.

§ 9602.

CSA:

C. 138, § 212.

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-13.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1053, § 7(1), effective May 23.

32-8-113. Records - filing. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 22:

p. 103, § 14.

C.L.

§ 9603.

CSA:

C. 138, § 213.

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-14.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1053, § 7(1), effective May 23.

32-8-114. Hearings - notice - appeal - assessments conclusive evidence. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 22:

p. 104, § 15.

C.L.

§ 9604.

CSA:

C. 138, § 214.

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-15.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1053, § 7(1), effective May 23.

32-8-115. Collection of assessments - fund. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 22:

p. 105, § 16.

C.L.

§ 9605.

L. 35:

p. 707, § 1.

CSA:

C. 138, § 215.

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-16.

L. 79:

(2) amended, p. 1625, § 41, effective June 8.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1053, § 7(1), effective May 23.

32-8-116. Accepting securities for bond. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 37:

p. 926, § 2.

CSA:

C. 138, § 215(1).

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-17.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1053, § 7(1), effective May 23.

32-8-117. Assessments lien on property. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 22:

p. 107, § 17.

C.L.

§ 9606.

CSA:

C. 138, § 216.

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-18.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1053, § 7(1), effective May 23.

32-8-118. Assessments - coupons accepted in payment. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 22:

p. 107, § 18.

C.L.

§ 9607.

CSA:

C. 138, § 217.

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-19.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1053, § 7(1), effective May 23.

32-8-119. Perpetual ownership in district. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 22:

p. 107, § 19.

C.L.

§ 9608.

CSA:

C. 138, § 218.

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-20.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1053, § 7(1), effective May 23.

32-8-120. Construction. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 22:

p. 107, § 20.

C.L.

§ 9609.

CSA:

C. 138, § 219.

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-21.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1053, § 7(1), effective May 23.

32-8-121. Repeal - saving clause. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 22:

p. 108, § 22.

C.L.

§ 9611.

CSA:

C. 138, § 220.

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-22.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1053, § 7(1), effective May 23.

32-8-122. Board empowered to invest funds - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 43:

p. 483, § 1.

CSA:

C. 138, § 220(1).

CRS 53:

§ 93-1-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 93-1-23.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1119, § 40, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) added by revision, p. 1053, § 7(2).

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section effective February 1, 1998, when the department of local affairs assumed the powers of the Moffat tunnel commission pursuant to § 32-8-103 (7). (See L. 96, p. 1053.) Said § 32-8-103 (7) was repealed in 2002.

32-8-123. Projects within the district - distributions from Moffat tunnel fund - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 728, § 1, effective April 19.

L. 96:

(5) added by revision, p. 1053, § 7(2).

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section effective February 1, 1998, when the department of local affairs assumed the powers of the Moffat tunnel commission pursuant to § 32-8-103 (7). (See L. 96, p. 1053.) Said § 32-8-103 (7) was repealed in 2002.

32-8-124. Administration of district - department of local affairs - assumption of obligations - powers - immunity.

Annually on or before July 1, the department shall determine the amount of revenue necessary for administrative costs of the department relating to the property of the district. After setting aside sufficient revenue necessary for administrative costs, which may be paid from the available cash, securities, and other moneys of the district, not including proceeds from sales of district property, the department shall transfer all cash, securities, and other moneys of the district, including any remaining proceeds from sales of district property, to each of the counties and the city and county of Denver included, in whole or in part, in the district as specified in section 32-8-102 in such proportion as the total amount of taxes and assessments received by the district from each county or city and county of Denver and its taxpayers since the district's creation is to the total of all taxes and assessments received by the district from those sources since the district's creation.

The department shall have authority over all of the property of the district to the same extent as other property of the department; except that, if this authority conflicts with or is limited by any provision of this article, the provision of this article shall apply. Except as otherwise provided in this article, the state shall not assume any liability for the acts, omissions, indebtedness, or other obligations of the board or the district and shall be immune from any action relating to the construction, operation, or maintenance of the Moffat tunnel, its approaches, or equipment, pursuant to the provisions of the "Colorado Governmental Immunity Act", article 10 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1051, § 6, effective May 23.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended with relocated provisions, p. 1071, § 4, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) was formerly numbered as § 24-32-2903.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 274, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

32-8-124.3. Contracts for use of tunnel.

The department shall have:

The right to enforce the provisions of any contracts and to modify the contracts upon mutual agreement of the respective parties to the contracts; and

The power to enter into contracts with persons and with private and public corporations for the right to use the tunnel for the transmission of power, for telephone and other communication lines, for railroad and railway purposes, and for any other purpose to which the same may be adapted. All the contracts and rights of use shall be subject and subordinate to all prior contracts and may not impair the rights of any existing legal user.

Users shall be responsible for the cost of maintaining, to the extent of their use, the Moffat tunnel, its approaches, and equipment.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added with relocated provisions, p. 1072, § 5, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 24-32-2904.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 274, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

32-8-124.5. Rules - right to construct and repair.

The executive director of the department is authorized to adopt reasonable rules relating to the Moffat tunnel subject to the provisions of this article and subject to existing contractual rights and obligations of the users. All rules of the board shall be repealed upon the adoption of rules by the executive director relating to the Moffat tunnel pursuant to this subsection (1).

As provided through any existing contractual rights and in accordance with reasonable rules of the department, users shall have the right to construct and repair, for their own benefit and at their sole cost, betterments or improvements on or to the Moffat tunnel relating to their respective uses, as long as the betterments or improvements do not interfere with other existing uses.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added with relocated provisions, p. 1072, § 5, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 24-32-2905.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 274, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

32-8-124.7. Property of Moffat tunnel improvement district.

The department shall have the authority to convey or transfer ownership of all tangible property, real and personal, or any interest therein owned by the district for fair market value. Each user shall have the right to purchase, to the extent of its use, real property interests of the district at fair market value, which shall be determined pursuant to the appraisal procedures of the department. Fair market value, as used in this section, shall not include any improvements or the value of any improvements owned or paid for by the user. In addition, when determining fair market value of any portion of or interest in the real property of the district, the value or detriment of any lease, license, or permit granted for the benefit of the party acquiring such real property shall not be considered. Each user shall also have a commercially reasonable right of first refusal to purchase at the fair market value, to the extent of its use, any real property interest offered for conveyance.

The purchaser of any real property or interest therein of the district, whether the purchaser is a current user or any other party, shall take the property subject to then existing leases, contracts for use, licenses, or other encumbrances on or obligations relating to the property and the right of the district, and its successors and assigns, to reasonable access across the interests conveyed for access to the tunnel.

Proceeds from any conveyance shall be used first for the expenses of the conveyance. Expenses of conveyance, including administrative costs incurred by the state and legal and other costs incurred in connection with the sale of the property of the district, shall not in the aggregate exceed four percent of the purchase price of the property being conveyed. Any remaining proceeds shall be immediately transferred to the counties and the city and county of Denver included, in whole or in part, in the district as specified in section 32-8-102, in such proportion as the total amount of taxes and assessments received by the district from each county or the city and county of Denver and its taxpayers since the district's creation is to the total of all taxes and assessments received by the district from those sources since the district's creation. Proceeds may be transferred directly to the counties and the city and county of Denver in conjunction with the closing of the sale of the property of the district, or they may be credited first to the cash fund created in section 32-8-126 before being immediately transferred to the counties and the city and county of Denver.

The department may adopt reasonable procedures consistent with this article for the disposition of property of the district. All dispositions shall be made at fair market value and unencumbered except to the extent provided in paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section. All conveyances of property shall be made in the name of the "Moffat tunnel improvement district, by and through the department of local affairs of the state of Colorado acting as the Moffat tunnel commission under authority of section 32-8-124.7, C.R.S."

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added with relocated provisions, p. 1073, § 5, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 24-32-2906.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 274, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

32-8-125. Moffat tunnel improvement district - sunset.

At such time as the district does not own any real property, all remaining property interests, tangible and intangible, including, but not limited to, fixtures, books, documents, contracts, records of title, and other records of the district shall be transferred to the department. The executive director of the department shall execute all necessary bills of sale and instruments of conveyance or assignment to evidence the transfer of property and shall take any other actions necessary to carry out the purposes of this article.

Upon the completion of all actions required by subsection (1) of this section, the executive director of the department shall certify that all such actions have been completed and that the Moffat tunnel improvement district is dissolved. The district shall be dissolved as of the effective date of such certification, and a copy of the certification shall be filed with the general assembly pursuant to the provisions of section 24-1-136 (9), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1051, § 6, effective May 23.

32-8-126. Moffat tunnel cash fund - created.

All cash, proceeds, and other moneys collected by the department pursuant to this article shall be transmitted to the state treasurer who shall credit the same to the Moffat tunnel cash fund, which fund is hereby created. Moneys in the fund not subject to immediate transfer pursuant to section 32-8-124.7 (2) shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the direct and indirect costs of the administration of this article.

Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (1) of this section to the contrary, on June 1, 2009, the state treasurer shall deduct eighty-six thousand seven hundred fifty-eight dollars from the Moffat tunnel cash fund and transfer such sum to the general fund.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, on June 30, 2020, the state treasurer shall transfer one hundred sixty-seven thousand four hundred sixty-three dollars from the Moffat tunnel cash fund to the general fund.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1051, § 6, effective May 23.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1074, § 6, effective August 7.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-279), ch. 367, p. 1930, § 19, effective June 1.

L. 2020:

(3) added, (HB 20-1381), ch. 171, p. 786, § 7, effective June 29.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 274, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.